Utah statutes.
70A-2-515.   Preserving evidence of goods in dispute.
In furtherance of the adjustment of any claim or dispute
(a)  either party on reasonable notification to the other and for the purpose
of ascertaining the facts and preserving evidence has the right to inspect,
test and sample the goods including such of them as may be in the possession
or control of the other; and
(b)  the parties may agree to a third party inspection or survey to determine
the conformity or condition of the goods and may agree that the findings shall
be binding upon them in any subsequent litigation or adjustment.
